Mississippi, session 2026, SB2682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Athletes Agents Reform Act." SECTION 2.  At least twenty-four (24) hours before entering into an agency contract or endorsement contract with a student-athlete, an athlete agent shall disclose to the student-athlete: (a)  Any known conflict of interest between the student-athlete and the athlete agent, including the athlete agent's business or employer. (b)  Any dual representation of the student-athlete and a third-party sponsor of the student-athlete. (c)  Any dual representation of the student-athlete and a member of the athletic department of the educational institution of the student-athlete. (d)  All fees, commissions and compensation structure of the representation. SECTION 3.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Student-Athlete Protection Fund."  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. The fund shall consist of: (a)  Monies deposited into the fund by the State Treasurer; (b)  The interest accruing to the fund; (c)  Monies received under the provisions of Section 73-42-17; (d)  Monies received from the federal government; (e)  Donations; and (f)  Monies received from such other sources as may be provided by or allowable under law. (2)  Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, monies in the fund shall be disbursed by the Secretary of State, as authorized by any final judgments issued under the authority of subsection (6) of Section 4 of this act, to compensate any student-athlete harmed by athlete agent misconduct or misconduct of individuals who acted as an athlete agent in this state towards the harmed student-athlete before being issued a certificate of registration under Section 73-42-11 or 73-42-15. SECTION 4. (1)  A student-athlete has a right of action against an athlete agent for damages caused by a violation of this act.  In an action under this section, the court may award to the prevailing party costs and reasonable attorney's fees. (2)  Damages of a student-athlete under subsection (1) include losses and expenses incurred because, as a result of the activities of an athlete agent, the student-athlete was injured by a violation of this chapter or was penalized, disqualified or suspended from participation in athletics by a national association, a conference or any other group or organization with authority over the sport, that promotes or regulates collegiate athletics. (3)  A right of action under this section does not accrue until the student-athlete discovers or by the exercise of reasonable diligence would have discovered the violation by the athlete agent. (4)  The student-athlete also has a right of action as provided in this section against any individual who acted as an athlete agent in this state before being issued a certificate of registration under Section 73-42-11 or 73-42-15 and caused the damages described in this section. (5)  This chapter does not restrict rights, remedies or defenses of any person under law or equity. (6)  In a final judgment of an action brought under the authority of this section, a court may award a student-athlete who has demonstrated damages under this section an amount of recovery, not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), from the Student-Athlete Protection Fund. SECTION 5.  Section 73-42-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-3.  In this chapter: (a)  "Agency contract" means an agreement in which a student-athlete authorizes a person to negotiate or solicit on behalf of the student-athlete a professional-sports-services contract, an endorsement contract, or compensation for the use of the student-athlete's publicity rights; provided, however, that an agency contract shall not provide for athlete agent compensation that exceeds twenty percent (20%) of the agency contract. (b)  "Athlete agent" means an individual who enters into an agency contract with a student-athlete or, directly or indirectly, recruits, induces or solicits a student-athlete to enter into an agency contract.  The term does not include a spouse, parent, sibling, grandparent or guardian of the student-athlete or an individual acting solely on behalf of a professional sports team or professional sports organization.  The term includes an individual who represents to the public that the individual is an athlete agent.  The term also includes, but is not limited to, attorneys, marketers, or professional advisors of student-athletes. (c)  "Athletic director" means an individual responsible for administering the overall athletic program of an educational institution or, if an educational institution has separately administered athletic programs for male students and female students, the athletic program for males or the athletic program for females, as appropriate. (d) "Contact" means a communication, direct or indirect, written or oral, between an athlete agent and a student-athlete, to recruit, induce or solicit the student-athlete to enter into an agency contract. (e)  "Endorsement contract" means an agreement under which a student-athlete receives compensation or anything of value for the student-athlete's publicity rights. (f) "Intercollegiate athletics program" means an intercollegiate athletics sport played at the collegiate level for which eligibility requirements for participation by a student-athlete are established by a national association, conference or any other group or organization with authority over the sport, that promotes or regulates collegiate athletics. (g)  "Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government; governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality; public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity. (h)  "Professional-sports-services contract" means an agreement under which an individual is employed or agrees to render services as a player on a professional sports team, with a professional sports organization, or as a professional athlete. (i)  "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. (j) "Registration" means registration as an athlete agent pursuant to this chapter. (k)  "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. (l) "Student-athlete" means an individual who is enrolled in or has signed a National Letter of Intent or other written agreement to enroll in a postsecondary educational institution or is being recruited by a postsecondary educational institution to participate in an intercollegiate athletics program.  If an individual is permanently ineligible to participate in a particular intercollegiate sport, the individual is not a student-athlete for purposes of that sport. SECTION 6.  Section 73-42-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-17.  (1)  An application for registration or renewal of registration must be accompanied by a fee in the following amount: (a) * * * Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00)  Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) for an initial application for registration. (b) * * * Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00)  Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) for an application for registration based upon a certificate of registration or licensure issued by another state. (c) * * * Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00)  Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) for an application for renewal of registration. (d) * * * Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00)  Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) for an application for renewal of registration based upon an application for renewal of registration or licensure submitted in another state. (2)  In addition, the Secretary of State may impose a fee for the actual costs incurred by the Secretary of State's office for processing and administering one or more criminal history background checks. (3)  Thirty-three Percent (33%) of the funds collected under the authority of subsection (1) of this section shall be deposited into the Student-Athlete Protection Fund created in Section 3 of this act. SECTION 7.  Section 73-42-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-27.  (1)  An athlete agent may not engage in any of the following activities, within this state or otherwise, with the intent to induce a student-athlete to enter into an agency contract: (a)  Give any materially false or misleading information or make a materially false promise or representation; (b)  Furnish anything of value to a student-athlete before the student-athlete enters into the agency contract; or (c)  Furnish anything of value to any individual other than the student-athlete or another registered athlete agent. (2)  An athlete agent may not intentionally: (a)  Initiate contact with a student-athlete unless registered under this chapter; (b)  Refuse or willfully fail to retain or permit inspection of the records required by Section 73-42-25 or fail to provide the Secretary of State with any statements, documents, records or testimony required by the secretary under Section 73-42-5(3) and (4); (c)  Violate Section 73-42-7 by failing to register; (d)  Provide materially false or misleading information in an application for registration or renewal of registration; (e)  Predate or postdate an agency contract; or (f)  Fail to notify a student-athlete prior to the student-athlete's signing an agency contract for a particular sport that the signing by the student-athlete may make the student-athlete ineligible to participate as a student-athlete in that sport. (3)  An athlete agent may not enter into a representation agreement which is not regulated by this chapter, an agency contract, or an endorsement contract that results in dual representation of any current student-athlete of the athlete agent or any student-athlete to whom the athlete agent is required to make disclosures to under Section 2 of this act and a third-party sponsor of the student-athlete without the written consent of the necessary student-athletes. (4)  An athlete agent may not enter into a representation agreement which is not regulated by this chapter, an agency contract, or an endorsement contract that results in a conflict of interest between any current student-athlete of the athlete agent or any student-athlete to whom the athlete agent is required to make disclosures to under Section 2 of this act and another person or entity represented by the athlete agent without the written consents of the necessary student-athletes. (5)  For current student-athletes of the athlete agent, prior to entering any contract prohibited under subsection (3) or (4) of this section, the athlete agent shall provide at least twenty-four hours disclosure to the athlete agent's current student-athlete prior to executing a contract addendum with the current student-athlete. SECTION 8.  Section 73-42-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-29.  The commission of any act prohibited by Section 73-42-27 by an athlete agent or acting as an athlete agent in this state before being issued a certificate of registration under Section 73-42-11 or 73-42-15 is a felony punishable by a fine of not more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or by imprisonment of not more than two (2) years, or both. SECTION 9.  Section 73-42-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-33.  The Secretary of State may assess a civil penalty against an athlete agent or any individual who acts as an athlete agent in this state before being issued a certificate of registration under Section 73-42-11 or 73-42-15 not to exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for a violation of this chapter. SECTION 10.  Section 73-42-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-19.  (1)  An agency contract must be in a record, signed by the parties. (2)  An agency contract must state or contain: (a)  The amount and method of calculating the consideration to be paid by the student-athlete for services to be provided by the athlete agent under the contract and any other consideration or anything of value that the athlete agent has received or will receive from any other source for entering into the contract or for providing the services; (b)  The name of any person not listed in the application for registration or renewal who will be compensated because the student-athlete signed the agency contract; (c)  A description of any expenses that the student-athlete agrees to reimburse; (d)  A description of the services to be provided to the student-athlete; (e)  The duration of the contract; * * * and (f)  The date of execution; and (g)  The written consents required under Section 73-42-27(3) or (4) if required. (3)  An agency contract, but not a contract addendum authorized under Section 73-42-27(5), must contain, in close proximity to the signature of the student-athlete, a conspicuous notice in boldface type in capital letters stating: WARNING TO STUDENT-ATHLETE IF YOU SIGN THIS CONTRACT: * * *(1){1}  YOU MAY LOSE YOUR ELIGIBILITY TO COMPETE AS A STUDENT-ATHLETE IN YOUR SPORT UNLESS THIS CONTRACT IS SERVING AS A PUBLICITY RIGHTS AGREEMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 37-97-103; * * *(2){2}  BOTH YOU AND YOUR ATHLETE AGENT ARE REQUIRED TO TELL YOUR ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, IF YOU HAVE AN ATHLETIC DIRECTOR, WITHIN 72 HOURS AFTER ENTERING INTO AN AGENCY CONTRACT; AND * * *(3){3}  YOU MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT WITHIN 14 DAYS AFTER SIGNING IT.  CANCELLATION OF THE CONTRACT MAY NOT REINSTATE YOUR ELIGIBILITY. (4)  An agency contract that does not conform to this section is voidable by the student-athlete. (5)  The athlete agent shall give a copy of the signed agency contract to the student-athlete at the time of signing. SECTION 11.  Sections 2 through 4 of this act shall be codified within Chapter 42 of Title 73. SECTION 12.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.